src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! =============================
!! # Sublexica for adjective roots
! =============================

!! * a1  god         god         godt        gode
!! * a1b stum        stum        stumt       stumme
!! * a2  norsk       norsk       norsk       norske
!! * a3  ekte        ekte        ekte        ekte
!! * a4  oppskjørtet oppskjørtet oppskjørtet oppskjørtede/oppskjørtete
!! * a5  makaber     makaber     makabert    makabre
!! *     lunken      lunken      lunkent     lunkne
!! * aV  blå         blå         blått       blå





!! ## Basic paradigms
! ===============

LEXICON a23
!! @LEXNAME@
  a2 ;
  a3 ;

!LEXICON a13
!  a1 ;
!  a3 ;

!LEXICON a12
!  a1 ;
!  a2 ;

LEXICON a1pos
 +A: positive ;

LEXICON a1
 +A: positive ;
 +A: a-neuter ;
 +A: grade-e  ;

LEXICON a1b
 +A:mX4 positive ;
 +A:mX4 a-neuter ;
 +A:mX4 grade-e  ;

LEXICON a1c ! morsom
             +A:mX4    positive ;
             +A:mX4    a-neuter ;
        +A+Comp:m%>ere # ;
+A+Superl+Indef:%>st   # ;
  +A+Superl+Def:%>ste  # ;

LEXICON a2lig
         :ig a2 ; ! herlig
 +Nynorsk+Use/NG:eg a2 ; ! herleg

LEXICON a2 !
 +A: positive    ;
 +A: a-no-neuter ;
 +A: grade-C     ;

LEXICON a3 !
 +A: positive-indef    ;
 +A: positive-def-null    ;
 +A: a-no-neuter ;
 +A: grade-C     ;
 
LEXICON a4 ! oppskjørtet
 +A:   positive-indef ;
 +A:   positive-def   ;
 +A:X6 positive-def   ;
 +A:   a-no-neuter    ;
 +A:   grade-e        ; !oppskjørtete
 +A:X6 grade-e        ; !oppskjørtede

LEXICON a5 ! overlegen
 +A:X1 positive ;
 +A:   a-neuter ;
 +A:X1 grade-e  ;

LEXICON aV ! ny, fri
   +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:     # ;
   +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:     # ;
   +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:tt   # ;
         +A+Pos+Sg+Def:e    # ;
  +A+Pos+Sg+Def+Use/NG:     # ;
       +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:e    # ;
         +A+Pos+Pl+Def:e    # ;
               +A+Comp:ere  # ;
             +A+Superl:est  # ;
         +A+Superl+Def:este # ;

       +A+Comp+Nynorsk+Use/NG:are  # ;
     +A+Superl+Nynorsk+Use/NG:ast  # ;
 +A+Superl+Def+Nynorsk+Use/NG:aste # ;


LEXICON EGEN ! legen
                  +A:nX1 positive ;
 +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:%>t   #        ;
                  +A:nX1 grade-e  ;

LEXICON LIKEDAN !
 +A:  positive-indef ; ! likedan
 +A:n positive-def   ; ! likedanne
 +A:  a-neuter       ; ! likedant



!! ### Sublexica
! =========

LEXICON positive
  positive-indef ;
  positive-def  ;

LEXICON positive-indef
!                    R ; ! A+N-samansetjingar er for dristig (?)
 +Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
 +Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
 +Pos+MF+Sg+Indef: # ; ! MF ???
!  +Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef: # ; ! ta Neu separat

LEXICON positive-def
 +Pos+Sg+Def+Clt:%>es # ;
 +Pos+Sg+Def:%>e # ;
 +Pos+Pl+Def:%>e # ;
 +Pos+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;

LEXICON positive-def-null
 +Pos+Sg+Def: # ;
 +Pos+Pl+Def: # ;
 +Pos+Pl+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a-neuter ! fint
 +Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:%>Q3t # ;
 +Der/AAdv+Adv:%>Q3t # ;

LEXICON a-no-neuter ! vennlig
 +Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:  # ;
 +Der/AAdv+Adv: # ;
!                    R ;
 
LEXICON grade-e
                 +Comp:%>ere  # ;
         +Superl+Indef:%>est  # ;
           +Superl+Def:%>este # ;

         +Comp+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>are  # ;
 +Superl+Indef+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ast  # ;
   +Superl+Def+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>aste # ;

LEXICON grade-C
                 +Comp:%>ere  # ;
         +Superl+Indef:%>est  # ;
           +Superl+Def:%>este # ;

         +Comp+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>are  # ;
 +Superl+Indef+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>ast  # ;
   +Superl+Def+Nynorsk+Use/NG:%>aste # ;


! Exceptional

LEXICON A_SMÅ
!                        +A:få   R ;
            +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:små  # ;
      +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:smått  # ;



LEXICON A_FÅ
!                     +A:få   R ;
          +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:få  # ;
            +A+Pos+Pl+Def:få  # ;
                +A+Comp:færre # ;
            +A+Superl:færrest # ;
       +A+Superl+Def:færreste # ;


LEXICON GAMMEL
!                  +A:gammel R ;
  +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:gammel # ;
  +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:gammel # ;
 +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:gammelt # ;
       +A+Pos+Sg+Def:gamle   # ;
       +A+Pos+Sg+Def:gamle   # ;
 +A+Pos+Pl+Indef+Clt:gamles   # ;
       +A+Pos+Pl+Def:gamle   # ;
             +A+Comp:eldre   # ;
           +A+Superl:eldst   # ;
       +A+Superl+Def:eldste  # ;

LEXICON GOD
!                   +A:god  R ;
   +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:god  # ;
   +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:god  # ;
  +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:godt  # ;
        +A+Pos+Sg+Def:gode  # ;
      +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:gode  # ;
        +A+Pos+Pl+Def:gode  # ;
              +A+Comp:bedre # ;
            +A+Superl:best  # ;
        +A+Superl+Def:beste # ;

      +A+Comp+Nynorsk+Use/NG:betre # ;

LEXICON LITEN
 +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:liten  # ;
 +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:lita   # ;
 +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:lite   # ;
       +A+Pos+Sg+Def:lille  # ;
       +A+Pos+Sg+Def:vesle  # ;
     +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:små    # ;
       +A+Pos+Pl+Def:små    # ;
             +A+Comp:mindre # ;
           +A+Superl:minst  # ;
       +A+Superl+Def:minste # ;


LEXICON STOR
!                   +A:stor   R ;
   +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:stor   # ;
   +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:stor   # ;
  +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:stort   # ;
        +A+Pos+Sg+Def:store   # ;
      +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:store   # ;
        +A+Pos+Pl+Def:store   # ;
        +A+Comp+Indef:større  # ;
      +A+Superl+Indef:størst  # ;
        +A+Superl+Def:største # ;

LEXICON UNG
!                 +A:ung    R ;
 +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:ung    # ;
 +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:ung    # ;
 +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:ungt   # ;
       +A+Pos+Sg+Def:unge   # ;
     +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:unge   # ;
       +A+Pos+Pl+Def:unge   # ;
             +A+Comp:yngre  # ;
           +A+Superl:yngst  # ;
      +A+Superl+Def:yngste  # ;


LEXICON VOND
!                   +A:vond R ;
   +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:vond # ;
   +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:vond # ;
  +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:vondt # ;
        +A+Pos+Sg+Def:vonde # ;
      +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:vonde # ;
        +A+Pos+Pl+Def:vonde # ;
              +A+Comp:verre # ;
            +A+Superl:verst # ;
       +A+Superl+Def:verste # ;



LEXICON MANGE
 +A:mange positive    ;
 +A:mange a-no-neuter ;
 FLER ;
 FLERE ;

LEXICON FLER
    +A+Comp+Pl+Indef+Use/NG:fler   # ;
LEXICON FLERE
   +A+Comp+Pl+Indef:flere  # ;
   +A+Superl+Pl+Def:fleste # ;
 +A+Superl+Pl+Indef:flest  # ;

LEXICON LANG
!                   +A:lang R ;
   +A+Pos+Msc+Sg+Indef:lang # ;
   +A+Pos+Fem+Sg+Indef:lang # ;
  +A+Pos+Neu+Sg+Indef:langt # ;
        +A+Pos+Sg+Def:lange # ;
      +A+Pos+Pl+Indef:lange # ;
        +A+Pos+Pl+Def:lange # ;
             +A+Comp:lengre # ;
           +A+Superl:lengst # ;
      +A+Superl+Def:lengste # ;
