src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
få: A_FÅ ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
små: A_SMÅ ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
vond: VOND ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
dritfin a1 ;
lekker a5 ;
septisk a2 ;
nordvestre a3 ;
stam a1b ; 
from a1b ; 
grom a1b ; 
urban a1 ; 
sleip a1 ; 
bekymringsfull:bekymringsfull7 a1 ;
møyefull:møyefull7 a1 ;
yndefull:yndefull7 a1 ;
fotsid a1 ;
avdød a1 ;
lang: LANG ;
vrang a1 ;
skyfri aV ;
likblek a1 ;
frekk a1 ;
rask a1 ;
tagal a1 ;
radikal a1 ;
atonal a1 ;
dental a1 ;
ustabil a1 ;
artifisiell a1 ;
funksjonell a1 ;
uaktuell a1 ;
lam a1b ;
klam a1b ;
ram a1b ;
endefram a1b ;
likefram a1b ;
omfram a1b ;
beintfram a1b ;
stram a1b ;
tam a1b ;
slem a1b ;
nem a1b ;
lærenem a1b ;
tungnem a1b ;
fornem a1b ;
grim a1b ;
arbeidsom a1c ;
voldsom a1c ;
skyndsom a1c ;
likesom a1c ;
plagsom a1c ;
langsom a1c ;
vågsom a1c ;
foretaksom a1c ;
uforetaksom a1c ;
tiltaksom a1c ;
tenksom a1c ;
ubetenksom a1c ;
mistenksom a1c ;
oppmerksom a1c ;
uvirksom a1c ;
selsom a1c ;
tålsom a1c ;
følsom a1c ;
ensom a1c ;
nennsom a1c ;
skjønnsom a1c ;
ulønnsom a1c ;
hjelpsom a1c ;
varsom a1c ;
pratsom a1c ;
aktsom a1c ;
vaktsom a1c ;
besluttsom a1c ;
strevsom a1c ;
møysom a1c ;
tom a1b ;
dum a1b ;
grum a1b ;
krum a1b ;
stum a1b ;
øm a1b ;
spontan a1 ;
straffbar a1 ;
mellomstor a1pos ;
kravstor a1pos ;
halvstor a1pos ;
rekordstor a1pos ;
dyr a1 ;
svær a1 ;
studentikos a1 ;
pretensiøs a1 ;
bevisstløs a1 ;
kommunikativ a1 ;
ustø aV ;
fornøyd a2 ;
ligegyldig a2 ;
myndig a2 ;
ærverdig a2 ;
jævlig a2 ;
fagmessig a2 ;
driftig a2 ;
riktig a2 ;
trottig a2 ;
klaustrofobisk a2 ;
pelagisk a2 ;
tsjekkoslovakisk a2 ;
komisk a2 ;
episk a2 ;
provokatorisk a2 ;
paradisisk a2 ;
usympatisk a2 ;
kritisk a2 ;
termoplastisk a2 ;
martsialsk a2 ;
germansk a2 ;
ørsk a1 ; 
tilbudt a2 ;
forvirret a4 ;
ekvivalent a2 ;
navngitt a2 ;
opplevd a3 ;
rede a3 ;
någjeldende a3 ;
henseende a3 ;
underliggende a3 ;
sammenhengende a3 ;
velsmakende a3 ;
appetittvekkende a3 ;
besøkende a3 ;
smilende a3 ;
nølende a3 ;
lignende a3 ;
rettskapende a3 ;
tilsvarende a3 ;
rullerende a3 ;
presserende a3 ;
oppmuntrende a3 ;
tilhørende a3 ;
anmassende a3 ;
ventende a3 ;
flytende a3 ;
arealkrevende a3 ;
avvende a3 ;
oppgående a3 ;
fjerde a3 ;
diskre a23 ;
mange: MANGE ;
ujålete a3 ;
åttiførste a3 ;
spesialutdannet a4 ;
sjalu a3 ;
kulturtilpasset a4 ;
beveget a4 ;
hårdtråkket a4 ;
gjenføket a4 ;
slimet a4 ;
velegnet a4 ;
multihandikappet a4 ;
klosset a4 ;
barfotet a4 ;
fremtidsrettet a4 ;
såkalt a4 ;
dunkel a5 ;
risikabel a5 ;
kapabel a5 ;
durabel a5 ;
profitabel a5 ;
presentabel a5 ;
komfortabel a5 ;
tredobbel a5 ;
visibel a5 ;
kompressibel a5 ;
edel a5 ;
spinkel a5 ;
ødsel a5 ;
sulten a5 ;
moden a5 ;
halvnaken a5 ;
gyllen a5 ;
voksen a5 ;
ørliten:ør LITEN ;
knøttliten:knøtt LITEN ;
sliten a5 ;
skitten a5 ;
skinnmager a5 ;
funksjonssikker a5 ;
god: GOD ;
fullgod:full GOD ;
jamngod:jamn GOD ;
jevngod:jevn GOD ;
ung: UNG ;
tung:t UNG ;
framtung:framt UNG ; 
fremtung:fremt UNG ; 
lagnadstung:lagnadst UNG ; 
alvorstung:alvorst UNG ; 
gammel: GAMMEL ;
eldgammel:eld GAMMEL ;
jamngammel:jamn GAMMEL ;
jevngammel:jevn GAMMEL ;
årsgammel:års GAMMEL ;
likedan LIKEDAN ;
egen:ege EGEN ;
liten: LITEN ;
stor: STOR ;
grei aV ;
skyldfri aV ;
dirkefri aV ;
alliansefri aV ;
smertefri aV ;
lytefri aV ;
tvangfri aV ;
hvirvelfri aV ;
alkoholfri aV ;
sukkerfri aV ;
motsigelsesfri aV ;
avdragsfri aV ;
fordomsfri aV ;
friksjonsfri aV ;
rustfri aV ;
snøfri aV ;
ny aV ;
mørkeblå aV ;
rå aV ;
grå aV ;
brungrå aV ;
sprø aV ;
fjellstø aV ;
allergiframkallende a3 ;
uhemmet a4 ;
straffefri:straffefri aV ;
avgiftsfri aV ;
forbeholden a5 ;
beruset a4 ;
resultatorientert a2 ;
bilfri aV ;
fullblods a3 ;
sølvgrå aV ;
right a23 ; 
massiv a1 ;
rødlig:rødl a2lig ;
uredelig:uredel a2lig ;
endelig:endel a2lig ;
prydelig:prydel a2lig ;
beklagelig:beklagel a2lig ;
usigelig:usigel a2lig ;
udugelig:udugel a2lig ;
ulikelig:ulikel a2lig ;
uslokkelig:uslokkel a2lig ;
umerkelig:umerkel a2lig ;
delelig:delel a2lig ;
hemmelig:hemmel a2lig ;
fruktsommelig:fruktsommel a2lig ;
tilreknelig:tilreknel a2lig ;
evinnelig:evinnel a2lig ;
tverrvitenskapelig:tverrvitenskapel a2lig ;
biskoppelig:biskoppel a2lig ;
unnselig:unnsel a2lig ;
tilforlatelig:tilforlatel a2lig ;
ustyrtelig:ustyrtel a2lig ;
etterrettelig:etterrettel a2lig ;
edruelig:edruel a2lig ;
bedrøvelig:bedrøvel a2lig ;
liflig:lifl a2lig ;
enspråklig:enspråkl a2lig ;
frivillig:frivill a2lig ;
fortrinnlig:fortrinnl a2lig ;
uforklarlig:uforklarl a2lig ;
ergerlig:ergerl a2lig ;
eventyrlig:eventyrl a2lig ;
ugodslig:ugodsl a2lig ;
folkerettslig:folkerettsl a2lig ;
vesentlig:vesentl a2lig ;
smålig:smål a2lig ;
tillatt a2 ;
bekymret a4 ;
elektromagnetisk a2 ;
forbauset a4 ;
stilsikker a5 ;
rettighetsbasert a2 ;
dreven a5 ;
ladbar a1 ;
uovertruffen a5 ;
løssluppen a5 ;
skolerelevant a2 ;
slepen a5 ;
lysegrå aV ;
tynnkledd a2 ;
medreisende a3 ;
feilfri aV ;
vannfri aV ;
vederlagsfri aV ;
trykksvak a1 ;
finskugrisk a2 ;
kjedsom a1c ;
folksom a1c ;
overfølsom a1c ;
ubesluttsom a1c ;
folketom a1b ;
døvstum a1b ;
heimebunden a5 ;
uårvåken a5 ;
nyankommen a5 ;
innpåsliten a5 ;
ordløs a1 ;
frostskadet a4 ;
grønnfarget a4 ;
oppmerket a4 ;
bueformet a4 ;
fullstappet a4 ;
nediset a4 ;
sjenerøsitet a4 ;
flerumettet a4 ;
fjorgammel:fjor GAMMEL  ;
urgammel:ur GAMMEL  ;
månedsgammel:måneds GAMMEL  ;
ukegammel:uke GAMMEL  ;
kolesterolsenkende a3 ;
halvsittende a3 ;
olivengrønn a1 ;
langveis a4 ;
parrelysten a5 ;
lappisk a2 ;
rekrutteringsmessig a2 ;
uoppdaget a4 ;
bruksberettiget a4 ;
vottedekket a4 ;
ferdigfremforhandlet a4 ;
ferdigutdannet a4 ;
kaldpresset a4 ;
kvinnerettet a4 ;
statsstøttet a4 ;
